Utah statutes.
31A-21-506.    Enforcement -- Private rights.
(1)  An insurer that violates this part is subject to any penalty permitted
under this title.
(2)  This part does not:
(a)  create a private right of action for a violation of this part; or
(b)  limit or impair the right of an individual to sue and recover damages
from the insurer in a civil action for a cause of action that is not based on
a violation of this part.
